Indiana, session 2026, SB150.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 27-8-14.5-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. As used in this chapter,
"prescription insulin drug" means a prescription drug that
contains insulin, is used to treat diabetes, and has been prescribed
as medically necessary.
SECTION 2. IC 27-8-14.5-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) This section applies to a
health insurance plan that is issued, delivered, amended, or
renewed after June 30, 2026.
(b) An insurer shall cap the total amount an insured is required
to pay for a thirty (30) day supply of the insured's prescription
insulin drugs at an amount not to exceed thirty-five dollars ($35),
regardless of the number of prescriptions and different types of
prescription insulin drugs prescribed and filled in that thirty (30)
day period.
2026 IN 150—LS 6278/DI 141


(c) An insurer may reduce the total amount an insured is
required to pay for a thirty (30) day supply of the insured's
prescription insulin drugs to an amount less than the amount of the
cap specified in subsection (b).
(d) If, solely due to the application of the cost sharing
calculation required under subsection (b), a health insurance plan
would fail to qualify as a high deductible health plan under Section
223 of the Internal Revenue Code, the requirement under
subsection (b) will not apply to the health insurance plan to the
extent necessary to avoid disqualification of the health insurance
plan.
2026 IN 150—LS 6278/DI 141